Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Operator’s License
186.576.
Definitions for KRS 186.576 to 186.579.

As used in KRS

186.576

to

186.579

:

“Applicant” means any person applying for an instruction permit or an operator’s license who must use a bioptic telescopic device in order to operate a motor vehicle;

“Binocular vision” means visual acuity that is 20/200 or better in both eyes, with or without corrective lenses;

“Bioptic telescopic device” means a two (2) focus optical system used to magnify distant objects by including a small telescope that is mounted in a spectacle lens in a manner to allow an unobstructed view of the horizontal visual field through a person’s normal distance corrective lens;

“Certified driver training program” means a program that provides and coordinates comprehensive assessment and training of driving skills and responses that emphasizes the vision, hearing, psychological, perceptual, orientation, and mobility skills of an applicant and that is certified by the department;

“Combined visual acuity” means visual acuity attained by using both eyes together where a person has binocular vision;

“Corrective lenses” means eyeglasses, contact lenses, and intraocular lenses, but does not mean a bioptic telescopic device;

“Daytime driving restriction” means operation of a motor vehicle is restricted to the period of time from between thirty (30) minutes after sunrise and thirty (30) minutes before sunset. Under this restriction, driving during adverse weather conditions that significantly reduce the visibility of the roadway, other traffic, and traffic control devices shall be prohibited;

“Office” means the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;

“Monocular vision” means visual acuity that is 20/200 or better in only one (1) eye, with or without corrective lenses;

“Restricted out-of-state driver” means a person who has been issued, by another state, a valid operator’s license with a restriction requiring the use of a bioptic telescopic device;

“Vision specialist” means a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist;

“Visual acuity” means the measure of a person’s visual acuity based on the Snellen visual acuity scale; and

“Visual field” means the area of physical space visible to the eye in a given fixed position.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 396, § 1, effective January 1, 2001; 2006, ch. 211, § 116, effective April 21, 2006; 2019 ch. 146, § 52, effective June 27, 2019.

186.577.
Testing applicants for initial operator’s license or initial instruction permit — Restrictions or driving privileges based on visual acuity test — Certain drivers restricted to use of bioptic telescopic devices. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

All persons applying for an initial operator’s license or an initial instruction permit shall submit to a test of visual acuity and visual field at the time of application.

Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better without corrective lenses shall not have a restriction placed on their driving privileges. Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better with corrective lenses shall have their driving privileges restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses. If a person fails to meet a 20/40 visual acuity standard, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall refer the person to a vision specialist for examination.

A person referred to a vision specialist by the Department of Kentucky State Police under subsection (2) of this section whose visual acuity is 20/60 or better shall be eligible to test for an instruction permit or operator’s license. If corrective lenses were prescribed by the vision specialist, the person’s driving privileges shall be restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.

Persons who meet the requirements of KRS

186.578

and are issued operator’s licenses under KRS

186.579

shall have their driving privileges restricted to the use of a bioptic telescopic device.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 396, § 2, effective January 1, 2001; 2007, ch. 85, § 198, effective June 26, 2007.

186.577.
Testing applicants for initial operator’s license or initial instruction permit — Restrictions or driving privileges based on visual acuity test — Testing not required for license renewal — Certain drivers restricted to use of bioptic telescopic devices — Administrative regulations — Fees to cover costs of testing — Deposit of fees in photo license account. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The following persons shall submit to a test of visual acuity and visual field at the time of application or renewal:

All persons applying for an initial or renewal operator’s license;

All persons applying for an initial or renewal instruction permit; and

Any person required to complete an examination under KRS

186.635

.

Vision testing under this section shall be administered to any person:

Applying for an initial operator’s license, an initial instruction permit, or reinstatement of a license when vision must be tested as required in KRS

186.480

:

Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or

By Kentucky State Police at the time of application;

Applying for operator’s license renewal or instruction permit renewal:

Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or

By the Transportation Cabinet at the time of application; or

Identified in Kentucky administrative regulations promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet or the Kentucky State Police as being required to undergo the exam required by KRS

186.480

.

Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet without corrective lenses shall not have a restriction placed on their driving privileges.

Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet with corrective lenses shall have their driving privileges restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.

If a person fails to meet a 20/40 visual acuity standard or the visual field standard established by the cabinet, the person shall be referred to a vision specialist for examination.

A person referred to a vision specialist under subsection (3) of this section whose visual acuity is 20/60 or better and who meets or exceeds the visual field standard established by the cabinet shall be eligible to test for an instruction permit or operator’s license, or shall be eligible for operator’s license renewal. If corrective lenses were prescribed by the vision specialist, the person’s driving privileges shall be restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.

Vision tests administered under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be deemed to meet the testing provisions outlined in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, if the person submits a driver vision testing form that complies with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section and the form has been completed by:

A vision specialist; or

An osteopath, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is credentialed by the cabinet to perform vision testing under this section.

All driver vision testing forms completed under subsection (5) of this section shall:

Attest that the applicant meets or exceeds the visual acuity standard and visual field standard established by the cabinet;

Only be valid if the vision specialist or the credentialed osteopath, credentialed physician, or credentialed advanced practice registered nurse signed and completed the vision testing form less than twelve (12) months prior to the date of application or renewal;

State whether the driving privileges of the applicant shall be restricted to mandate the use of corrective lenses; and

Clearly indicate that the vision testing under this section is a screening for minimum vision standards established in this section and is not a complete eye examination.

Any person seeking application or permit under subsection (1) of this section shall attest that he or she has submitted to and passed the visual acuity and visual field tests required under this section.

Any person renewing an operator’s license under KRS

186.416

shall be exempt from the vision testing requirements outlined in this section.

Persons who meet the requirements of KRS

186.578

and are issued operator’s licenses under KRS

186.579

shall:

Have their driving privileges restricted to the use of a bioptic telescopic device; and

Be exempt from this section.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to establishing visual field standards, the creation of a driver vision testing form, and establishing a credentialing process for osteopaths, physicians, and advanced practice registered nurses to conduct vision testing under this section.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to:

Implement a system for electronic transmission of driver vision testing forms and accompanying documentation; and

Assess a fee to an applicant to cover the administrative costs of performing on-site vision testing. Any funds received from this fee shall be deposited into the photo license account established in KRS

174.056

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 396, § 2, effective January 1, 2001; 2007, ch. 85, § 198, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

186.578.
Visual acuity requirements for certified driver training program — Testing of knowledge of motor vehicle laws — Daytime and nighttime operator's license examinations — Out-of-state drivers establishing residence in Kentucky — Restriction on taking of operator's license examination after three failings — Consequence of failure to pass examination.

Applicants accepted to participate in a certified driver training program shall meet the following minimum vision requirements:

A distance visual acuity of 20/200 or better, with corrective lenses, in the applicant’s better eye;

A visual field of at least one hundred twenty (120) degrees horizontally and eighty (80) degrees vertically in the same eye as used in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

A distance visual acuity of 20/60 or better using a bioptic telescopic device; and

No ocular diagnosis or prognosis that indicates a likelihood that significant deterioration of visual acuity or visual field to levels below the minimum standards outlined in this subsection will occur.

Upon acceptance into a certified driver training program, an applicant shall be given an examination to test his or her knowledge of the motor vehicle laws of the Commonwealth. This examination may be taken orally. Upon successful completion of this examination, the applicant shall be issued a temporary instruction permit, that shall be valid only when the applicant is accompanied by an employee of a certified driver training program. Temporary instruction permits issued under this section shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of issue.

An applicant who successfully completes a certified driver training program shall be reexamined by a vision specialist upon completion of the program. The examination shall certify that the applicant continues to meet the visual acuity and visual field standards set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

An applicant who successfully completes a certified driving training program and passes the visual reexamination required by subsection (3) of this section shall be eligible to take a comprehensive operator’s license examination administered by the Department of Kentucky State Police.

The operator’s license examination shall include testing of the applicant’s driving skills over a route specifically designed to test the applicant’s competency using a bioptic telescopic device.

If the applicant is a new driver, the applicant shall take a daytime and nighttime operator’s license examination, which may be given on the same day.

If the applicant is a currently licensed driver, the applicant may take either a daytime or a nighttime operator’s license examination, but if the applicant chooses a daytime operator’s license examination, any license granted shall be subject to a daytime restriction.

An applicant who is a restricted out-of-state driver establishing residence in Kentucky shall be required to take and pass a knowledge examination before being eligible to take the operator’s license examination.

An applicant who is a restricted out-of-state driver establishing residence in Kentucky shall not be required to complete a certified driver training program but shall be required to take and pass the visual examination outlined in subsection (3) of this section before taking the operator’s license examination.

If an applicant moving to Kentucky from another state possesses a valid bioptic operator’s license from the applicant’s previous state:

Without a daytime-only restriction, the applicant may take a daytime operator’s license examination, and upon passage of the examination, be granted a license without a daytime-only restriction;

With a daytime-only restriction and wishes to have it removed, the applicant shall take a nighttime operator’s license examination, and upon passage of the examination, be granted a license without a daytime-only restriction; or

With a daytime-only restriction and does not wish to have it removed, the applicant shall take a daytime operator’s license examination, and upon passage of the examination, be granted a license with a daytime-only restriction.

If an applicant or restricted out-of-state driver fails the operator’s license examination three (3) times, he or she shall not be eligible to retake the examination until successfully completing additional training from a certified driver training program and obtaining an affidavit from the program director or bioptic driving instructor recommending that the applicant or restricted out-of-state driver be allowed to retake the examination.

The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation in the Education and Labor Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set standards for a certified driver training program and to otherwise carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 396, § 3, effective January 1, 2001; 2006, ch. 211, § 117, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 199, effective June 26, 2007; 2014, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 146, § 53, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 92, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 116 and 236, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

186.579.
Restricted operator's license requiring daytime driving, use of bioptic telescopic device, and vehicle with left and right outside mirrors — Removal of restrictions — Annual submission of comprehensive visual examination — Suspension of license.

The Transportation Cabinet shall issue, to an applicant who successfully passes the operator’s license examination outlined in KRS

186.578

(4), an operator’s license with the following restrictions:

Required use of a bioptic telescopic device;

Restricted to daytime driving upon the recommendation of a vision specialist or upon failure of a nighttime examination administered under KRS

186.578

; and

Restricted to vehicles with left and right outside mirrors.

A restriction to daytime driving in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall be removed if the applicant or licensed driver:

Obtains a recommendation from a vision specialist;

Successfully completes an evaluation by the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation’s bioptic driving program and training specifically designed for night driving from a certified driver training program; and

Passes a comprehensive night driving examination.

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection, an operator’s license issued under KRS

186.578

and

186.579

shall be valid for four (4) years or (8) years at the discretion of the applicant as outlined in KRS

186.4101

.

The holder of a license issued in accordance with this section and KRS

186.578

shall submit the results of a comprehensive visual examination to Kentucky Office of Vocational Rehabilitation each year before the last day of the birth month of the license holder. An operator’s license shall be subject to suspension if the license holder does not submit results of the comprehensive visual examination required under this paragraph.

If the vision specialist completing the examination required under paragraph (b) of this subsection certifies that the conditions causing the visual impairment are stable, then the license shall remain valid. If the conditions causing the visual impairment are unstable or deteriorating, the license holder may be required to undergo additional testing as required by the department and may have his or her operator’s license suspended if he or she cannot successfully pass the tests.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 396, § 4, effective January 1, 2001; 2014, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 100, § 28, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 24, effective March 27, 2020; 2022 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

186.580.
Appeals.

If any person is aggrieved by any final order of the cabinet relating to the denial, revocation, suspension, or cancellation of an operator’s license or motorcycle operator’s license other than orders of revocation or suspension when the facts render revocation or suspension mandatory, he may file a petition for judicial review in the Circuit Court of the county in which he resides, or in the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

2739m-44, 2739m-70: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 63, § 7; 1970, ch. 22, § 9; 1970, ch. 74, § 1; 1996, ch. 318, § 73, effective July 15, 1996; 2020 ch. 51, § 25, effective March 27, 2020.

186.590.
Minor’s negligence imputed to person signing application or allowing him or her to drive.

Any negligence of a minor under the age of eighteen (18) who has been licensed upon an application signed as provided by KRS

186.470

, when driving any motor vehicle upon a highway, shall be imputed to the person who signed the application, if required, of the minor for the license. That person shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages caused by the negligence.

If a minor deposits or there is deposited in his or her behalf, a proof of financial responsibility in form and amounts required by KRS

304.39-110

, the person who signed the application shall not, while such proof is maintained, be subject to the liability imposed by subsection (1). If the minor is the owner of a motor vehicle, the proof of financial responsibility shall be with respect to the operation of that motor vehicle; if not an owner, then with respect to the operation of any motor vehicle.

Every motor vehicle owner who causes or knowingly permits a minor under the age of eighteen (18) to drive the vehicle upon a highway, and any person who gives or furnishes a motor vehicle to the minor shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for damage caused by the negligence of the minor in driving the vehicle.

HISTORY:

2739m-41, 2739m-53, 2739m-54; 2017 ch. 11, § 3.

186.600.
Age limit for drivers of school buses and public passenger-carrying vehicles. [Repealed.]

186.610.
Prohibited uses of licenses — Fraud in application.

No person shall:

Display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his possession any operator’s license knowing it to be fictitious or to have been canceled, revoked, suspended or altered;

Lend to, or knowingly permit the use of by, one not entitled to, any operator’s license issued to the person so lending or permitting the use of the license;

Represent as one’s own any operator’s license not issued to the person displaying the license;

Fail to surrender to the cabinet upon demand, any operator’s license which has been suspended, canceled or revoked;

Use a false name or give a false address in any application for an operator’s license or any renewal or duplicate, or knowingly make a false statement or knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any application.

History.

2739m-56.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A police officer who is presented with a driver’s license he or she determines to be suspended or revoked should seize such license, both as a statutorily prohibited item and as evidence in connection with violation of subdivision (1) of this section, and deal with it accordingly; furthermore, upon seizing a driver’s license, a police officer should not then permit the person whose license is seized to operate a vehicle upon the highway.

OAG 87-3

.

Violation of subdivision (1) of this section is a misdemeanor for which a full custody arrest may be effected, or in the alternative, a citation may be issued, in accordance with subsection (1) of KRS

431.015

.

OAG 87-3

.

186.620.
Unlawful to drive or permit another to drive without license — Display of license on request of peace officer — Defense.

No person shall authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned or controlled by him to be driven by any person who has no legal right to drive it or in violation of any of the provisions of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

.

No person who has not applied for an operator’s license or whose operator’s license has been denied, canceled, suspended or revoked, or whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been withdrawn, shall operate any motor vehicle upon the highways while the license is denied, canceled, suspended, or revoked or his privilege to operate a motor vehicle is withdrawn, or the license has not been applied for.

If the operator of a motor vehicle on a public highway is requested by a peace officer, authorized to arrest a person for a violation of subsection (2) of this section or KRS

189A.090

, to display his operator’s license and fails to display his operator’s license, that fact shall be admissible in court and shall be prima facie proof of violation of subsection (2) of this section or KRS

189A.090

.

It shall be a defense to a charge under this section and KRS

189A.090

if the person charged presents to the court an operator’s license issued to him before the date of the charge and which was valid on the date of the charge.

History.

2739m-58, 2739m-59; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 21, effective July 1, 1991.

186.630.
Renting a motor vehicle to another. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to any other person if the latter is not licensed, unless he is a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to another until he has inspected the operator’s license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and compared and verified the signature on the license with the signature of that person written in his presence.

Every person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of his license and the date and place of issuance of his license. That record shall be open to inspection by any police officer or employee of the cabinet.

History.

2739m-66.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Renting car to drunk or drug addict prohibited, KRS

189.530

.

186.630.
Renting a motor vehicle to another. [Effective January 1, 2023]

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to any other person if the latter is not licensed, unless he is a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to another until he has inspected the operator’s license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and compared and verified the signature on the license with the signature of that person written in his presence.

Every person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of his license and the date and place of issuance of his license. That record shall be open to inspection by any police officer or employee of the cabinet.

This section shall not apply to peer-to-peer car sharing as defined in KRS

365.520

.

HISTORY:

2739m-66; 2022 ch. 153, § 15, effective January 1, 2023.

186.635.
Persons required to complete examinations under KRS 186.480 — Reinstatement.

The following persons shall be required to successfully complete the examinations required under KRS

186.480

prior to being issued a Kentucky operator’s license:

A person who has been issued a Kentucky instruction permit or intermediate license;

A person who has applied for a Kentucky operator’s license under KRS

186.412

or

186.4121

; and

Other persons as identified in an administrative regulation promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the Transportation Cabinet under KRS Chapter 13A.

A person who possessed a Kentucky operator’s license that has expired for a period of less than five (5) years and was not subject to suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification at the time of expiration may have that license reinstated without submitting to the examinations required under KRS

186.480

by applying to the cabinet for renewal. Upon submission of any vision testing required under KRS

186.577

and review of the person’s driving history record, the cabinet shall issue a renewal operator’s license to an applicant under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 264, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 65, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 200, effective June 26, 2007; Former §

186.6401

was renumbered to be §

186.635

, by 2017, ch. 100, § 29, effective January 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 153, § 2, effective April 8, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2022). In codification, a correction has been made to subsection (2) of this statute. Section 2 of 2022 RS Senate Bill 124, which amended this statute, contains a reference to “this paragraph,” which does not correspond to the relevant subdivision of this section. It is clear from the context that the reference was intended to read “this subsection,” and the Reviser of Statutes has corrected this reference under the authority of
KRS

7.136

.

186.640.
Driving without operator’s license is evidence of negligence in accident.

Any driver involved in any accident resulting in any damage whatever to person or to property who is ineligible to procure an operator’s license, or being eligible therefor has failed to procure a license, or whose license has been canceled, suspended or revoked prior to the time of the accident, shall be deemed prima facie negligent in causing or contributing to cause the accident.

History.

2739m-62.

186.6401.
Persons required to complete examinations under KRS 186.480. [Renumbered.]

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 264, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 65, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 200, effective June 26, 2007.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS

186.635

.